Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Article 4. Rewards.

Sec. 12.60.230.
Reward for information leading to conviction of certain persons.

A reward of $200 shall be paid to any person not a peace officer who lodges information that leads to the arrest and conviction of any person or persons maliciously breaking into and entering any cache, cabin, house, or warehouse, whether occupied or unoccupied, located outside the boundaries of an incorporated town in the state.

History.

(§ 9.23 ch 34 SLA 1962)

Sec. 12.60.240.
Payment of reward.

The Department of Revenue shall pay all claims for rewards upon certificate by a judge or clerk of the superior court, showing that the claimant has lodged information that resulted in an arrest and conviction under the provisions of AS

12.60.230

.

History.

(§ 9.24 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 31 ch 8 SLA 1971)